New Jersey, session 222, S3731.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.1981, c.188 (C.40A:14-86.1) is amended to read as follows: The board of commissioners of a fire district, following the authorization by voters of the issuance of bonds pursuant to N.J.S.40A:14-86, may by resolution borrow money and issue negotiable notes in anticipation of the bond issue.  Any note shall be designated a "bond anticipation note" and shall contain a recital that it is issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds.  Such notes may be issued for a period not to exceed [1] one year, and may be renewed from time to time [not to] for additional periods, none of which shall exceed [1] one year; but all such notes, including renewals, shall mature and be paid not later than the [third anniversary of the date of the original notes] first day of the fifth month following the close of the tenth fiscal year next following the date of the original notes;  provided, however, that no notes shall be renewed beyond the first anniversary date of the original notes unless an amount of such notes, at least equal to the first legally payable installment of the bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued, is paid and retired on or before [the second anniversary date, and if the notes are renewed beyond the second anniversary date of the original notes, a like amount is paid or retired  on or before the third anniversary date from funds other than the proceeds of obligations;  except that the notes shall mature and be paid not later than the  first day of the fifth month following the close of the third fiscal year next  following the date of the original notes, provided that, in addition to amounts  paid and retired pursuant to this section, an amount of such notes equal to not  less than the first legally payable installment of the bonds in anticipation of  which the notes are issued has been paid and retired not later than the end of  the third fiscal year from funds other than the proceeds of obligations] each subsequent anniversary date beyond which the notes are renewed from funds other than the proceeds of obligations. The period of usefulness as defined in N.J.S.40A:2-22 of any purpose for which bonds are issued shall include the period during which notes issued in anticipation of such bonds are outstanding, including all renewals thereof. Funds derived from the issuance of fire district bonds may be used to redeem notes issued in anticipation of the bond issue. (cf: P.L.1981, c.188, s.1) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.